Utah statutes.
62A-4a-706.   Jurisdiction over delinquent children.

Any court having jurisdiction to place delinquent children may place such a child in an institution in another state, pursuant to Article VI of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children, and shall retain jurisdiction as provided in Article V of the compact.

